data/grammar/fst/suffixes-generated.lexc
++ttaili+1vv:ttaili VerbContinuations ;
++ttaili+1vv:KGUARDttaili # ;
++ttaili+1vv:KGUARDttaili VerbContinuations ;
++ttaili+1vv:taili # ;
++ttaili+1vv:taili VerbContinuations ;
++ttaili+1vv:KGUARDtaili # ;
++ttaili+1vv:KGUARDtaili VerbContinuations ;
++tu+1vv:tu # ;
++tu+1vv:tu VerbContinuations ;
++tu+1vv:KGUARDtu # ;
++tu+1vv:KGUARDtu VerbContinuations ;
++tu+1vv:SUPPRtu # ;
++tu+1vv:SUPPRtu VerbContinuations ;
++tuinnaq+1vv:tuinnaq # ;
++tuinnaq+1vv:tuinnaq VerbContinuations ;
++tuinnaq+1vv:KGUARDtuinnaq # ;
++tuinnaq+1vv:KGUARDtuinnaq VerbContinuations ;
++tuinnaq+1vv:SUPPRtuinnaq # ;
++tuinnaq+1vv:SUPPRtuinnaq VerbContinuations ;
++tuinnariaqaq+1vv:tuinnariaqaq # ;
++tuinnariaqaq+1vv:tuinnariaqaq VerbContinuations ;
++tuinnariaqaq+1vv:KGUARDtuinnariaqaq # ;
++tuinnariaqaq+1vv:KGUARDtuinnariaqaq VerbContinuations ;
++tuinnariaqaq+1vv:SUPPRtuinnariaqaq # ;
++tuinnariaqaq+1vv:SUPPRtuinnariaqaq VerbContinuations ;
++tuinnau+1vv:tuinnau # ;
++tuinnau+1vv:tuinnau VerbContinuations ;
++tuinnau+1vv:KGUARDtuinnau # ;
++tuinnau+1vv:KGUARDtuinnau VerbContinuations ;
++tuq+1vv:tuq # ;
++tuq+1vv:tuq VerbContinuations ;
++tuq+1vv:tuq AfterApIRoot ;
++tuq+1vv:KGUARDtuq # ;
++tuq+1vv:KGUARDtuq VerbContinuations ;
++tuq+1vv:KGUARDtuq AfterApIRoot ;
++tuq+1vv:SUPPRtuq # ;
++tuq+1vv:SUPPRtuq VerbContinuations ;
++tuq+1vv:SUPPRtuq AfterApIRoot ;
++ujji+1vv:jjujji # ;
++ujji+1vv:jjujji VerbContinuations ;
++ujji+1vv:VOICEujji # ;
++ujji+1vv:VOICEujji VerbContinuations ;
++ujji+1vv:SUPPRujji # ;
++ujji+1vv:SUPPRujji VerbContinuations ;
++uq+3vv:uq # ;
++uq+3vv:uq VerbContinuations ;
++uq+3vv:uq AfterApRiRoot ;
++uq+3vv:SUPPRuq # ;
++uq+3vv:SUPPRuq VerbContinuations ;
++uq+3vv:SUPPRuq AfterApRiRoot ;
++uqqaq+1vv:DECAPuqqaq # ;
++uqqaq+1vv:DECAPuqqaq VerbContinuations ;
++uqqaq+1vv:DECAPuqqaq AfterApIRoot ;
++uqqaq+1vv:iuqqaq # ;
++uqqaq+1vv:iuqqaq VerbContinuations ;
++uqqaq+1vv:iuqqaq AfterApIRoot ;
++uqqaq+1vv:SUPPRDECAPuqqaq # ;
++uqqaq+1vv:SUPPRDECAPuqqaq VerbContinuations ;
++uqqaq+1vv:SUPPRDECAPuqqaq AfterApIRoot ;
++uti+1vv:jjuti # ;
++uti+1vv:jjuti VerbContinuations ;
++uti+1vv:jjuti AfterApJiRoot ;
++uti+1vv:VOICEuti # ;
++uti+1vv:VOICEuti VerbContinuations ;
++uti+1vv:VOICEuti AfterApJiRoot ;
++uti+1vv:SUPPRuti # ;
++uti+1vv:SUPPRuti VerbContinuations ;
++uti+1vv:SUPPRuti AfterApJiRoot ;
++vaalliq+1vv:vaalliq # ;
++vaalliq+1vv:vaalliq VerbContinuations ;
++vaalliq+1vv:paalliq # ;
++vaalliq+1vv:paalliq VerbContinuations ;
++vagiq+1vv:vagiq # ;
++vagiq+1vv:vagiq VerbContinuations ;
++vagiq+1vv:vagiiq # ;
++vagiq+1vv:vagiiq VerbContinuations ;
++vagiq+1vv:pagiq # ;
++vagiq+1vv:pagiq VerbContinuations ;
++vagiq+1vv:pagiiq # ;
++vagiq+1vv:pagiiq VerbContinuations ;
++vak+1vv:vak # ;
++vak+1vv:vak VerbContinuations ;
++vak+1vv:pak # ;
++vak+1vv:pak VerbContinuations ;
++valatsi+1vv:valatsi # ;
++valatsi+1vv:valatsi VerbContinuations ;
++valatsi+1vv:palatsi # ;
++valatsi+1vv:palatsi VerbContinuations ;
++vallai+1vv:vallai # ;
++vallai+1vv:vallai VerbContinuations ;
++vallai+1vv:pallai # ;
++vallai+1vv:pallai VerbContinuations ;
++vallia+1vv:vallia # ;
++vallia+1vv:vallia VerbContinuations ;
++vallia+1vv:pallia # ;
++vallia+1vv:pallia VerbContinuations ;
++vasaaq+1vv:vasaaq # ;
++vasaaq+1vv:vasaaq VerbContinuations ;
++vasaaq+1vv:pasaaq # ;
++vasaaq+1vv:pasaaq VerbContinuations ;
++vik+2vv:vik # ;
++vik+2vv:vik VerbContinuations ;
++vik+2vv:SUPPRvik # ;
++vik+2vv:SUPPRvik VerbContinuations ;
++llik+1vv:llik # ;
++llik+1vv:llik VerbContinuations ;
++llik+1vv:SUPPRllik # ;
++llik+1vv:SUPPRllik VerbContinuations ;
++gianngaq+1vv:gianngaq # ;
++gianngaq+1vv:gianngaq VerbContinuations ;
++gianngaq+1vv:SUPPRgianngaq # ;
++gianngaq+1vv:SUPPRgianngaq VerbContinuations ;
++gianngaq+1vv:SUPPRrianngaq # ;
++gianngaq+1vv:SUPPRrianngaq VerbContinuations ;
++nngaq+1vv:nngaq # ;
++nngaq+1vv:nngaq VerbContinuations ;
++nngaq+1vv:SUPPRnngaq # ;
++nngaq+1vv:SUPPRnngaq VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON VvSuffixesGeneratedSpeculative
++gi+2vv:gi OnlyModeIntEndings ;
++gi+2vv:gi OnlyModeDecEndings ;
++gi+2vv:ni OnlyModeIntEndings ;
++gi+2vv:ni OnlyModeDecEndings ;
++gi+2vv:ki OnlyModeIntEndings ;
++gi+2vv:ki OnlyModeDecEndings ;
++gi+2vv:SUPPRgi OnlyModeIntEndings ;
++gi+2vv:SUPPRgi OnlyModeDecEndings ;
++gi+2vv:SUPPRri OnlyModeIntEndings ;
++gi+2vv:SUPPRri OnlyModeDecEndings ;
++gusuk+2vv:gusuk # ;
++gusuk+2vv:gusuk VerbContinuations ;
++gusuk+2vv:SUPPRgusuk # ;
++gusuk+2vv:SUPPRgusuk VerbContinuations ;
++gusuk+2vv:SUPPRrusuk # ;
++gusuk+2vv:SUPPRrusuk VerbContinuations ;
++jarniq+1vv:jarniq # ;
++jarniq+1vv:jarniq VerbContinuations ;
++jarniq+1vv:SUPPRgarniq # ;
++jarniq+1vv:SUPPRgarniq VerbContinuations ;
++jarniq+1vv:SUPPRniq # ;
++jarniq+1vv:SUPPRniq VerbContinuations ;
++jjaa+1vv:jjaa OnlyJunniiqVvSuffix ;
++jjaa+1vv:jjaa OnlyNngitVvSuffix ;
++jjaa+1vv:SUPPRjjaa OnlyJunniiqVvSuffix ;
++jjaa+1vv:SUPPRjjaa OnlyNngitVvSuffix ;
++kisauti+1vv:kisauti # ;
++kisauti+1vv:kisauti VerbContinuations ;
++kisauti+1vv:SUPPRkisauti # ;
++kisauti+1vv:SUPPRkisauti VerbContinuations ;
++lauq+2vv:lauq OnlyModeImpEndings ;
++lauq+2vv:SUPPRlauq OnlyModeImpEndings ;
++li+2vv:li # ;
++li+2vv:li VerbContinuations ;
++li+2vv:li AfterApKsiRoot ;
++li+2vv:li AfterApIRoot ;
++li+2vv:SUPPRli # ;
++li+2vv:SUPPRli VerbContinuations ;
++li+2vv:SUPPRli AfterApKsiRoot ;
++li+2vv:SUPPRli AfterApIRoot ;
++mi+1vv:mi OnlyModeImpEndings ;
++mi+1vv:mi OnlyModePartEndings ;
++mi+1vv:mi OnlyModeCausEndings ;
++mi+1vv:mi OnlyModeCondEndings ;
++mi+1vv:mi OnlyModeFreqEndings ;
++mi+1vv:mi OnlyModeDubEndings ;
++mi+1vv:mi OnlyModeGerEndings ;
++mi+1vv:VOICEmi OnlyModeImpEndings ;
++mi+1vv:VOICEmi OnlyModePartEndings ;
++mi+1vv:VOICEmi OnlyModeCausEndings ;
++mi+1vv:VOICEmi OnlyModeCondEndings ;
++mi+1vv:VOICEmi OnlyModeFreqEndings ;
++mi+1vv:VOICEmi OnlyModeDubEndings ;
++mi+1vv:VOICEmi OnlyModeGerEndings ;
++niaqtaksari+1vv:niaqtaksari # ;
++niaqtaksari+1vv:niaqtaksari VerbContinuations ;
++niaqtaksari+1vv:NASALniaqtaksari # ;
++niaqtaksari+1vv:NASALniaqtaksari VerbContinuations ;
++qalauq+1vv:qalauq OnlyModeImpEndings ;
++qalauq+1vv:SUPPRqalauq OnlyModeImpEndings ;
++qu+1vv:qu OnlyModePartEndings ;
++qu+1vv:SUPPRqu OnlyModePartEndings ;
++sungaaq+1vv:sungaaq OnlyModeCondEndings ;
++sungaaq+1vv:SUPPRsungaaq OnlyModeCondEndings ;
++tappiaq+1vv:tappiaq OnlyModeCausEndings ;
++tappiaq+1vv:KGUARDtappiaq OnlyModeCausEndings ;
++tuaq+1vv:tuaq OnlyModeCausEndings ;
++tuaq+1vv:tuaq OnlyModeCondEndings ;
++tuaq+1vv:KGUARDtuaq OnlyModeCausEndings ;
++tuaq+1vv:KGUARDtuaq OnlyModeCondEndings ;
++tuaq+1vv:SUPPRtuaq OnlyModeCausEndings ;
++tuaq+1vv:SUPPRtuaq OnlyModeCondEndings ;
++ujjuaq+1vv:ujjuaq # ;
++ujjuaq+1vv:ujjuaq VerbContinuations ;
